Mississippi, session 2026, SB2352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 21-19-49, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 21-19-49.  (1)  The governing authority of any municipality or the board of supervisors of any county are hereby authorized and empowered to appropriate money or dedicate and convey municipally owned buildings and property or county-owned buildings and property, as the case may be, to the school district or districts situated within that municipality or county for the purpose of erecting, purchasing or otherwise providing the school building or a site for such school building of such school district, in cases where the governing authority or board of supervisors are of the opinion that the location of such school building within the corporate limits of the municipality or the county, or in close proximity thereto, will be of special benefit to the inhabitants of the municipality or county. (2)  Municipalities, municipal police departments and the sheriffs' departments may contract with the school board of any school district, including private, nonprofit schools, to provide additional Law Enforcement Officers Training Academy-certified police protection to said school district on such terms and for such reimbursement as the school district and the entity may agree in their discretion. (3)  (a)  The governing authority of any municipality or the board of supervisors of any county may allow off-duty municipal or county law enforcement officers who are hired individually for security purposes by the school district or districts within that municipality or county to use municipal or county law enforcement uniforms and equipment, which includes vehicles, during such off-duty employment. (b)  If the person or entity, and the person's or entity's insurer, fails or refuses to endorse, indemnify and hold harmless the employing jurisdiction, the employing jurisdiction shall not approve the use of the official vehicle of the employing jurisdiction for private security services. (4)  The governing authority of any municipality, in its discretion, may donate funds, equipment or in-kind services to any school district located within the boundaries of the municipality to assist the voluntary character development or public service programs of that school district. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.